Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 8. Speed Restrictions

§ 1081.
Basic rule and maximum limits.

No individual shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions, having regard for the actual and potential hazards then existing. In every event, speed shall be controlled as necessary to avoid colliding with any individual, vehicle, or other object on or adjacent to the highway.

Except when there exists a special hazard that requires lower speed in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the limits specified in this section or established pursuant to this section are maximum lawful speeds, and no individual shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed in excess of 50 miles per hour.

The maximum speed limits set forth in this section may be altered in accordance with sections 1003, 1004, 1007, and 1010 of this title.

The driver of every vehicle shall, consistent with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, drive at an appropriate, reduced speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railway grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching the crest of a hill, when traveling upon any narrow or winding roadway, and when special hazard exists.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 178.

§ 1082.
Slow-moving vehicles.

All slow-moving vehicles shall keep at all times as close to the right-hand side of the highway as is reasonably practicable.
A person operating a motor vehicle that impedes other traffic on a highway shall pull off the highway at the first opportunity to allow the traffic to pass before proceeding.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1083.
Special speed limitations.

No person may drive any vehicle equipped with iron, steel, or solid rubber tires at a speed greater than 10 miles per hour.

No person may drive a vehicle over any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway at a speed that is greater than the maximum speed that can be maintained with safety to the bridge or structure, except when the bridge or structure is signposted as provided in this section. The legislative body of a municipality may erect notices one hundred feet in both directions along the highway stating the maximum speed at which vehicles may be operated on the bridge or structure.

The Traffic Committee, upon request from the legislative body of any municipality shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway, and if it finds that the bridge or structure cannot, with safety to itself, withstand vehicles traveling at the speed otherwise permissible under this chapter, the Committee shall declare the maximum speed of vehicles upon the bridge or structure and shall cause or permit suitable signs stating the maximum speed to be erected and maintained before each end of the bridge or structure.

No person may drive a vehicle towing a trailer exempted from the weight requirements as provided in subsection 1307(h) of this title at speeds greater than 35 miles per hour.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1975, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 1, 1976.